apertium-ina.ina.dix
     <pardef n="te_obj__prn">
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="se_obj__prn">
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="l/e_obj__prn">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>as</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>os</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>a</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>as</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>os</l><r>e<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

     <pardef n="nos_obj__prn">
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>
     <pardef n="vos_obj__prn">
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pro"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>


    <pardef n="nihil__prn">      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="que__cnjsub">
            <e i=""><p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ora__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gratias__ij">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="ij"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="como__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tres__num">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="catto__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="can__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="roc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>        
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <!-- Verbs - Paradigms -->
      <pardef n="verbs">
        <e><p><l>r</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- cantar -->
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p></e> <!-- io canta/ -->
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="imp"/></r></p></e> <!-- canta/ (imp) -->
        <e><p><l>va</l><r><s n="pii"/></r></p></e> <!-- io canta/va -->
        <e><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="fti"/></r></p></e> <!-- io canta/ra -->
        <e><p><l>rea</l><r><s n="cni"/></r></p></e> <!-- io canta/rea -->
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="verbs-pp">
        <e><p><l>te</l><r><s n="pp"/></r></p></e> <!-- canta/te -->
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="verbs-pprs">
        <e><p><l>nte</l><r><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>  <!-- canta/nte -->
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="verbs-subj"> <!-- subjunctive RL, better solution? -->
        <e r="RL"><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p></e> <!-- que io canta (subj RL?)-->
        <e r="RL"><p><l>va</l><r><s n="pis"/></r></p></e>  <!-- si io cantava (subj RL?)-->
        <e r="RL"><p><l>ra</l><r><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>  <!-- quando io cantara (subj RL?) -->
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="ar-verbs">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs"/></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e>
        <e><p><l>a</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-subj"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="er-verbs">
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs"/></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e> <!-- cred-i-te -->
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e> <!-- cred-e-nte -->
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-subj"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="er-ie-verbs"> <!-- irregular-er -->
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs"/></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e> <!-- fac-i-te -->
        <e><p><l>ie</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e> <!-- fac-ie-nte -->
        <e><p><l>e</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-subj"/></e>
      </pardef>

      <pardef n="ir-verbs">
        <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs"/></e>
        <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pp"/></e> <!-- part-i-te -->
        <e><p><l>ie</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-pprs"/></e> <!-- part-ie-nte -->
        <e><p><l>i</l><r></r></p><par n="verbs-subj"/></e>
      </pardef>

     <e lm="te"><i>te</i><par n="te_obj__prn"/></e>
     <e lm="le"><i>l</i><par n="l/e_obj__prn"/></e>
     <e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="se_obj__prn"/></e>
     <e lm="nos"><i>nos</i><par n="nos_obj__prn"/></e>
     <e lm="vos"><i>vos</i><par n="vos_obj__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="nihil"><i>nihil</i><par n="nihil__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="non"><i>non</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="como"><i>como</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sur"><i>sur</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ancora"><i>ancora</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="poco"><i>poco</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jam"><i>jam</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tunc"><i>tunc</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="como"><i>como</i><par n="como__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="quando"><i>quando</i><par n="como__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="proque"><i>proque</i><par n="como__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ubi"><i>ubi</i><par n="como__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gratias"><i>gratias</i><par n="gratias__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hodie"><i>hodie</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cinque"><i>cinque</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="nove"><i>nove</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dece-tres"><i>dece-tres</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="dece-septe"><i>dece-septe</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="vinti-un"><i>vinti-un</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="vinti-cinque"><i>vinti-cinque</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="vinti-nove"><i>vinti-nove</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trenta-tres"><i>trenta-tres</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="trenta-septe"><i>trenta-septe</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="quaranta-un"><i>quaranta-un</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="quaranta-cinque"><i>quaranta-cinque</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="quaranta-nove"><i>quaranta-nove</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="cinquanta-tres"><i>cinquanta-tres</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="cinquanta-septe"><i>cinquanta-septe</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="sexanta-cinque"><i>sexanta-cinque</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="septanta-tres"><i>septanta-tres</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="octanta-un"><i>octanta-un</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="octanta-nove"><i>octanta-nove</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="novanta-septe"><i>novanta-septe</i><par n="tres__num"/></e>
    <e lm="que"><i>que</i><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="roc"><i>roc</i><par n="roc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="verme"><i>verme</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amico"><i>amico</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="historia"><i>historia</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nausea"><i>nausea</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cinema"><i>cinema</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="retro"><i>retro</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="multo"><i>multo</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nonobstante"><i>nonobstante</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="exactemente"><i>exactemente</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="heri"><i>heri</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ubi"><i>ubi</i><par n="como__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="infra"><i>infra</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="interim"><i>interim</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mesmo"><i>mesmo</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ben"><i>ben</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="forsan"><i>forsan</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="accordo"><i>accordo</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moneta"><i>moneta</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="prorogar"><i>prorogar</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="adaptation"><i>adaptation</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="delegato"><i>delegato</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="admission"><i>admission</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="adulator"><i>adulator</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="affectation"><i>affectation</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="exir"><i>exir</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="gratias"><i>gratias</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="insulto"><i>insulto</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="aggressor"><i>aggressor</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="artichoc"><i>artichoc</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="cloaca"><i>cloaca</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="confortation"><i>confortation</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="musculo"><i>musculo</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="alluvion"><i>alluvion</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="amento"><i>amento</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="amplificator"><i>amplificator</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="anguilla"><i>anguilla</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="annihilation"><i>annihilation</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="annuncio"><i>annuncio</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="apotheosis"><i>apotheosis</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="arcoballista"><i>arcoballista</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="association"><i>association</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="auspicio"><i>auspicio</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="ballet"><i>ballet</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="bono"><i>bono</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="contribution"><i>contribution</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="harmonium"><i>harmonium</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="harpa"><i>harpa</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
<e lm="safran"><i>safran</i><par n="can__n"/></e>
<e lm="surprisa"><i>surprisa</i><par n="catto__n"/></e>
     <e lm="de nove">          <i>de<b/>nove</i><par n="ora__adv"/></e>
